Hawaii statutes.
TITLE
30A. UNIFORM PROBATE

CODE

Revision Note

Title 30A added by revisor.

Chapter

560 Uniform Probate Code

CHAPTER
560

UNIFORM
PROBATE CODE

ARTICLE I

GENERAL
PROVISIONS, DEFINITIONS, AND

PROBATE
JURISDICTION OF COURT

Part 1. Short Title, Construction,
General

Provisions

Section

560:1-101 Short title

560:1-102 Purposes; rule of construction

560:1-103 Supplementary general principles of law
applicable

560:1-104 Severability

560:1-105 Construction against implied repeal

560:1-106 Effect of fraud and evasion

560:1-107 Evidence of death or status

560:1-108 Acts by holder of general power

Part 2. Definitions

560:1-201 General definitions

Part 3. Scope, Jurisdiction, and Courts

560:1-301 Territorial application

560:1-302 Subject matter jurisdiction

560:1-303 Venue; multiple proceedings; transfer

560:1-304 Practice in court

560:1-305 Records and certified copies

560:1-306 Jury trial

560:1-307 Registrar; powers

560:1-308 Appeals

560:1-309 Reserved

560:1-310 Oath or affirmation on filed documents

560:1-311 Documents sealed upon filing

Part 4. Notice, Parties, and
Representation in

Estate Litigation and Other
Matters

560:1-401 Notice; method and time of giving

560:1-402 Notice; waiver

560:1-403 Pleadings; when parties bound by others;
notice

ARTICLE II

INTESTATE
SUCCESSION AND WILLS

Part 1. Intestate Succession

560:2-101 Intestate estate

560:2-102 Share of spouse or reciprocal
beneficiary

560:2-103 Share of heirs other than surviving
spouse or

reciprocal beneficiary

560:2-104 Requirement that heir survive decedent
for one

hundred twenty hours

560:2-105 No taker

560:2-105.5 Escheat of kuleana lands

560:2-106 Representation

560:2-107 Kindred of half blood

560:2-108 Afterborn heirs

560:2-109 Advancements

560:2-110 Debts to decedent

560:2-111 Alienage

560:2-112 Dower and curtesy abolished

560:2-113 Individuals related to decedent through
two lines

560:2-114 Parent and child relationship

Part 2. Elective Share of Surviving
Spouse

560:2-201 Definitions

560:2-202 Elective share

560:2-203 Composition of the augmented estate

560:2-204 Decedent's net probate estate

560:2-205 Decedent's nonprobate transfers to
others

560:2-206 Decedent's nonprobate transfers to the
surviving

spouse or reciprocal beneficiary

560:2-207 Surviving spouse's or reciprocal
beneficiary's

property and nonprobate transfers to
others

560:2-208 Exclusions, valuation, and overlapping
application

560:2-209 Sources from which elective share
payable

560:2-210 Personal liability of recipients

560:2-211 Proceeding for elective share; time
limit

560:2-212 Right of election personal to surviving
spouse

or reciprocal beneficiary; incapacitated
surviving

spouse or reciprocal beneficiary

560:2-213 Waiver of right to elect and of other
rights

560:2-214 Protection of payors and other third
parties

Part 3. Spouse and Children Unprovided
for in Wills

560:2-301 Entitlement of spouse or reciprocal
beneficiary;

premarital will

560:2-302 Omitted children

Part 4. Exempt Property and Allowances

560:2-401 Applicable law

560:2-402 Homestead allowance

560:2-403 Exempt property

560:2-404 Family allowance

560:2-405 Source, determination, and documentation

Part 5. Wills, Will Contracts, and
Custody and

Deposit of Wills

560:2-501 Who may make will

560:2-502 Execution; witnessed wills; holographic
wills

560:2-503 Writings intended as wills, etc.

560:2-504 Self-proved will

560:2-505 Who may witness

560:2-506 Choice of law as to execution

560:2-507 Revocation by writing or by act

560:2-508 Revocation by change of circumstances

560:2-509 Revival of revoked will

560:2-510 Incorporation by reference

560:2-511 Testamentary additions to trusts

560:2-512 Events of independent significance

560:2-513 Separate writing identifying devise of
certain

types of tangible personal property

560:2-514 Contracts concerning succession

560:2-515 Reserved

560:2-516 Duty of custodian of will; liability

560:2-517 Penalty clause for contest

Part 6. Rules of Construction Applicable
Only to

Wills

560:2-601 Scope

560:2-602 Will may pass all property and
after-acquired

property

560:2-603 Antilapse; deceased devisee; class gifts

560:2-604 Failure of testamentary provision

560:2-605 Increase in securities; accessions

560:2-606 Nonademption of specific devises; unpaid
proceeds

of sale, condemnation, or insurance;
sale by

conservator or agent

560:2-607 Nonexoneration

560:2-608 Exercise of power of appointment

560:2-609 Ademption by satisfaction

Part 7. Rules of Construction Applicable
to Wills

and Other Governing Instruments

560:2-701 Scope

560:2-702 Requirement of survival by one hundred
twenty

hours

560:2-703 Choice of law as to meaning and effect
of

governing instrument

560:2-704 Power of appointment; meaning of
specific

reference requirement

560:2-705 Class gifts construed to accord with
intestate

succession

560:2-706 Life insurance; retirement plan;
transfer-on-death

registration; deceased beneficiary

560:2-707 Survivorship with respect to future
interests

under terms of trust; substitute takers

560:2-708 Class gifts to "descendants",
"issue", or "heirs

of the body"; form of distribution
if none

specified

560:2-709 Representation; per capita at each
generation; per

stirpes

560:2-710 Worthier-title doctrine abolished

560:2-711 Interest in "heirs" and like

Part 8. General Provisions Concerning
Probate and

Nonprobate Transfers

560:2-801 Repealed

560:2-802 Effect of divorce, annulment, decree of

separation, and termination of
reciprocal

beneficiary relationship

560:2-803 Effect of homicide on intestate
succession, wills,

trusts, joint assets, life insurance,
and

beneficiary designations

560:2-804 Revocation of probate and nonprobate
transfers by

divorce or termination of reciprocal
beneficiary

relationship; no revocation by other
changes of

circumstances

Part 9. Statutory Rule Against
Perpetuities;

Honorary Trusts

560:2-901 to 907 Reserved

Part 10. Uniform International Wills Act

560:2-1001 to 1010 Reserved

ARTICLE III

PROBATE OF
WILLS AND ADMINISTRATION

Part 1. General Provisions

560:3-101 Devolution of estate at death;
restrictions

560:3-102 Necessity of order of probate for will

560:3-103 Necessity of appointment for
administration

560:3-104 Claims against decedent; necessity of

administration

560:3-105 Proceedings affecting devolution and

administration; jurisdiction of subject
matter

560:3-106 Proceedings within the exclusive
jurisdiction of

court; service; jurisdiction over
persons

560:3-107 Scope of proceedings; proceedings
independent;

exception

560:3-108 Probate, testacy and appointment proceedings;

ultimate time limit

560:3-109 Statutes of limitation on decedent's
cause of

action

Part 2. Venue for Probate and
Administration;

Priority to Administer; Demand
for Notice

560:3-201 Venue for first and subsequent estate
proceedings;

location of property

560:3-202 Appointment or testacy proceedings;
conflicting

claim of domicile in another state

560:3-203 Priority among persons seeking
appointment as

personal representative

560:3-204 Demand for notice of order or filing
concerning

decedent's estate

Part 3. Informal Probate and Appointment

Proceedings

560:3-301 Informal probate or appointment
proceedings;

application; contents

560:3-302 Informal probate; duty of registrar;
effect of

informal probate

560:3-303 Informal probate; proof and findings
required

560:3-304 Informal probate; unavailable in certain
cases

560:3-305 Informal probate; registrar not
satisfied

560:3-306 Informal probate; notice requirements

560:3-307 Informal appointment proceedings; delay
in order;

duty of registrar; effect of appointment

560:3-308 Informal appointment proceedings; proof
and

findings required

560:3-309 Informal appointment proceedings;
registrar not

satisfied

560:3-310 Informal appointment proceedings; notice

requirements

560:3-311 Informal appointment unavailable in
certain cases

560:3-312 to 322 Reserved

Part 4. Formal Testacy and Appointment
Proceedings

560:3-401 Formal testacy proceedings; nature; when
commenced

560:3-402 Formal testacy or appointment
proceedings;

petition; contents

560:3-403 Formal testacy proceedings; notice of
hearing on

petition

560:3-404 Formal testacy proceedings; written
objections to

probate

560:3-405 Formal testacy proceedings; uncontested
cases;

hearings and proof

560:3-406 Formal testacy proceedings; contested
cases;

testimony of attesting witnesses

560:3-407 Formal testacy proceedings; burdens in
contested

cases

560:3-408 Formal testacy proceedings; will
construction;

effect of final order in another
jurisdiction

560:3-409 Formal testacy proceedings; order;
foreign will

560:3-410 Formal testacy proceedings; probate of
more than

one instrument

560:3-411 Formal testacy proceedings; partial
intestacy

560:3-412 Formal testacy proceedings; effect of
order;

vacation

560:3-413 Formal testacy proceedings; vacation of
order for

other cause

560:3-414 Formal proceedings concerning
appointment of

personal representative

Part 5. Supervised Administration

560:3-501 Supervised administration; nature of
proceeding

560:3-502 Supervised administration; petition;
order

560:3-503 Supervised administration; effect on
other

proceedings

560:3-504 Supervised administration; powers of
personal

representative

560:3-505 Supervised administration; interim
orders;

distribution and closing orders

Part 6. Personal Representative;
Appointment,

Control, and Termination of
Authority

560:3-601 Qualification

560:3-602 Acceptance of appointment; consent to
jurisdiction

560:3-603 Bond not required without court order,
exceptions

560:3-604 Bond amount; security; procedure;
reduction

560:3-605 Demand for bond by interested person

560:3-606 Terms and conditions of bonds

560:3-607 Order restraining personal
representative

560:3-608 Termination of appointment; general

560:3-609 Termination of appointment; death or
disability

560:3-610 Termination of appointment; voluntary

560:3-611 Termination of appointment by removal;
cause;

procedure

560:3-612 Termination of appointment; change of
testacy

status

560:3-613 Successor personal representative

560:3-614 Special administrator; appointment

560:3-615 Special administrator; who may be
appointed

560:3-616 Special administrator; appointed
informally;

powers and duties

560:3-617 Special administrator; formal
proceedings; power

and duties

560:3-618 Termination of appointment; special
administrator

Part 7. Duties and Powers of Personal

Representatives

560:3-701 Time of accrual of duties and powers

560:3-702 Priority among different letters

560:3-703 General duties; relation and liability to
persons

interested in estate; standing to sue

560:3-704 Personal representative to proceed
without court

order; exception

560:3-705 Duty of personal representative;
information to

heirs and devisees

560:3-706 Duty of personal representative;
inventory and

appraisement

560:3-707 Employment of appraisers

560:3-708 Duty of personal representative;
supplementary

inventory

560:3-709 Duty of personal representative;
possession of

estate

560:3-710 Power to avoid transfers

560:3-711 Powers of personal representatives; in
general

560:3-712 Improper exercise of power; breach of
fiduciary

duty

560:3-713 Sale, encumbrance, or transaction
involving

conflict of interest; voidable;
exceptions

560:3-714 Persons dealing with personal
representative;

protection

560:3-715 Transactions authorized for personal

representatives; exceptions

560:3-716 Powers and duties of successor personal

representative

560:3-717 Co-representatives; when joint action
required

560:3-718 Powers of surviving personal
representative

560:3-719 Compensation of personal representative

560:3-720 Expenses in estate litigation

560:3-721 Proceedings for review of employment of
agents and

compensation of personal representatives
and

employees of estate

Part 8. Creditors' Claims

560:3-801 Notice to creditors

560:3-802 Statutes of limitations

560:3-803 Limitations on presentation of claims

560:3-804 Manner of presentation of claims

560:3-805 Classification of claims

560:3-806 Allowance of claims

560:3-807 Payment of claims

560:3-808 Individual liability of personal
representative

560:3-809 Secured claims

560:3-810 Claims not due and contingent or
unliquidated

claims

560:3-811 Counterclaims

560:3-812 Execution and levies prohibited

560:3-813 Compromise of claims

560:3-814 Encumbered assets

560:3-815 Administration in more than one state;
duty of

personal representative

560:3-816 Final distribution to domiciliary
representative

Part 9. Special Provisions Relating to
Distribution

560:3-901 Successors' rights if no administration

560:3-902 Distribution; order in which assets
appropriated;

abatement

560:3-903 Right of retainer

560:3-904 Interest on general pecuniary devise

560:3-905 Penalty clause for contest

560:3-906 Distribution in kind; valuation; method

560:3-907 Distribution in kind; evidence

560:3-908 Distribution; right or title of
distributee

560:3-909 Improper distribution; liability of
distributee

560:3-910 Purchasers from distributees protected

560:3-911 Partition for purpose of distribution

560:3-912 Private agreements among successors to
decedent

binding on personal representative

560:3-913 Distributions to trustees

560:3-914 Disposition of unclaimed assets

560:3-915 Distribution to person under disability

560:3-916 Apportionment of estate taxes

Part 10. Closing Estates

560:3-1001 Formal proceedings terminating
administration;

testate or intestate; order of general
protection

560:3-1002 Formal proceedings terminating testate

administration; order construing will
without

adjudicating testacy

560:3-1003 Closing estates; by sworn statement of
personal

representative

560:3-1004 Liability of distributees to claimants

560:3-1005 Limitations on proceedings against
personal

representative

560:3-1006 Limitations on actions and proceedings
against

distributees

560:3-1007 Certificate discharging liens securing
fiduciary

performance

560:3-1008 Subsequent administration

Part 11. Compromise of Controversies

560:3-1101 Effect of approval of agreements
involving trusts,

inalienable interests, or interests of
third

persons

560:3-1102 Procedure for securing court approval of

compromise

Part 12. Collection of Personal Property
by

Affidavit and Summary
Administration

Procedure for Small Estates

560:3-1201 Collection of personal property by
affidavit

560:3-1202 Effect of affidavit

560:3-1203 Small estates; summary administration
procedure

560:3-1204 Small estates; closing by sworn
statement of

personal representative

560:3-1205 Estates of $100,000 or less; clerk of
court to

administer

560:3-1206 Publication by clerk of appointment as
personal

representative; notice to creditors,
heirs, etc.

560:3-1207 Presentation of claims of creditors

560:3-1208 Claims barred when

560:3-1209 Duties of clerk and distribution

560:3-1210 Undistributed proceeds or balances,
disposition

560:3-1211 Exemption from costs

560:3-1212 Estates of persons leaving no known
relatives

560:3-1213 Reserved

560:3-1214 Annual audit of accounts of clerk

560:3-1215 Prohibition on the private practice of
law by

attorneys for small estates

ARTICLE IV

FOREIGN
PERSONAL REPRESENTATIVES; ANCILLARY ADMINISTRATION

Part 1. Definitions

560:4-101 Definitions

Part 2. Powers of Foreign Personal
Representatives

560:4-201 Payment of debt and delivery of property
to

domiciliary foreign personal
representative

without local administration

560:4-202 Payment or delivery discharges

560:4-203 Resident creditor notice

560:4-204 Proof of authority-bond

560:4-205 Powers

560:4-206 Power of representatives in transition

560:4-207 Ancillary and other local
administrations;

provisions governing

Part 3. Jurisdiction Over Foreign
Representatives

560:4-301 Jurisdiction by act of foreign personal

representative

560:4-302 Jurisdiction by act of decedent

560:4-303 Service on foreign personal
representative

Part 4. Judgments and Personal
Representative

560:4-401 Effect of adjudication for or against
personal

representative

ARTICLE V

GUARDIANSHIP
AND PROTECTIVE PROCEEDINGS

Part 1. General Provisions

560:5-101 Short title

560:5-102 Definitions

560:5-103 Reserved

560:5-104 Facility of transfer

560:5-105 Delegation of power by parent or
guardian

560:5-106 Subject matter jurisdiction

560:5-107 Transfer of jurisdiction

560:5-108 Venue

560:5-109 Practice in court

560:5-110 Letters of office

560:5-111 Effect of acceptance of appointment

560:5-112 Termination of or change in guardian's
or

conservator's appointment

560:5-113 Notice

560:5-114 Waiver of notice

560:5-115 Guardian ad litem

560:5-116 Request for notice; interested persons

560:5-117 Multiple appointments or nominations

Part 2. Guardianship of Minor

560:5-201 Appointment and status of guardian

560:5-202 Parental appointment of guardian

560:5-203 Objection by minor or others to parental

appointment

560:5-204 Judicial appointment of guardian;
conditions for

appointment

560:5-205 Judicial appointment of guardian;
procedure

560:5-206 Judicial appointment of guardian;
priority

of minor's nominee; limited guardianship

560:5-207 Duties of guardian

560:5-208 Powers of guardian

560:5-209 Rights and immunities of guardian

560:5-210 Termination of guardianship; other
proceedings

after appointment

Part 3. Guardianship of Incapacitated
Person

560:5-301 Appointment and status of guardian

560:5-302 Appointment of guardian by will or other
writing

560:5-303 Appointment of guardian by will or other
writing;

effectiveness; acceptance; confirmation

560:5-304 Judicial appointment of guardian;
petition

560:5-305 Judicial appointment of guardian;
preliminaries to

hearing

560:5-306 Judicial appointment of guardian;
professional

evaluation

560:5-307 Confidentiality of records

560:5-308 Judicial appointment of guardian;
presence and

rights at hearing

560:5-309 Notice

560:5-310 Who may be guardian; priorities

560:5-311 Findings; order of appointment

560:5-312 Emergency guardian

560:5-313 Temporary substitute guardian

560:5-314 Duties of guardian

560:5-315 Powers of guardian

560:5-316 Rights and immunities of guardian;
limitations

560:5-317 Reports; monitoring of guardianship

560:5-318 Termination or modification of
guardianship

Part 4. Protection of Property of
Protected Person

560:5-401 Protective proceeding

560:5-402 Jurisdiction over business affairs of
protected

person

560:5-403 Original petition for appointment or
protective

order

560:5-404 Notice

560:5-405 Original petition; minors; preliminaries
to

hearing

560:5-406 Original petition; preliminaries to
hearing

560:5-407 Confidentiality of records

560:5-408 Original petition; procedure at hearing

560:5-409 Original petition; orders

560:5-410 Powers of court

560:5-411 Required court approval

560:5-412 Protective arrangements and single
transactions

560:5-413 Who may be conservator; priorities

560:5-414 Petition for order subsequent to
appointment

560:5-415 Bond

560:5-416 Terms and requirements of bond

560:5-417 Compensation and expenses

560:5-418 General duties of conservator

560:5-419 Inventory; records

560:5-420 Reports; appointment of kokua kanawai

560:5-421 Title by appointment

560:5-422 Protected person's interest inalienable

560:5-423 Sale, encumbrance, or other transaction
involving

conflict of interest

560:5-424 Protection of person dealing with
conservator

560:5-425 Powers of conservator in administration

560:5-426 Delegation

560:5-427 Principles of distribution by
conservator

560:5-428 Death of protected person

560:5-429 Presentation and allowance of claims

560:5-430 Personal liability of conservator

560:5-431 Termination of proceedings

560:5-432 Payment of debt and delivery of property
to

foreign conservator without local
proceeding

560:5-433 Foreign conservator; proof of authority;

bond; powers

Part 5. Powers of Attorney

560:5-501, 502 Repealed

Part 6. Incapacitated Persons
Sterilization Rights

560:5-601 Definitions

560:5-602 Sterilization of wards

560:5-603 Initiation of proceeding

560:5-604 Appointment of guardian ad litem

560:5-605 Notice

560:5-606 Repealed

560:5-606.5 Reproductive rights advisory list

560:5-607 Hearing

560:5-608 Criteria

560:5-609 Appeals

560:5-610 Repealed

560:5-611 Confidentiality of and access to records

560:5-612 No liability arising from sterilization;
exception

ARTICLE VI

NONPROBATE
TRANSFERS

Part 1. Multiple-Party Accounts

560:6-101 Definitions

560:6-102 Ownership as between parties, and
others;

protection of financial institutions

560:6-103 Ownership during lifetime

560:6-104 Right of survivorship

560:6-105 Effect of written notice to financial
institution

560:6-106 Accounts and transfers nontestamentary

560:6-107 Rights against multiple-party accounts

560:6-108 Financial institution protection;
payment on

signature of one party

560:6-109 Financial institution protection;
payment after

death or disability; joint account

560:6-110 Financial institution protection;
payment of

payable-on-death account

560:6-111 Financial institution protection;
payment of trust

account

560:6-112 Financial institution protection;
discharge

560:6-113 Financial institution protection;
set-off

Part 2. Reserved

560:6-201 Reserved

ARTICLE VII

TRUST
ADMINISTRATION

Part 1. Trust Registration

560:7-101 Duty to register trusts

560:7-102 Registration procedures

560:7-103 Effect of registration

560:7-104 Effect of failure to register

560:7-105 Reserved

560:7-106 Release of registration

Part 2. Jurisdiction of Court Concerning
Trusts

560:7-201 Court; jurisdiction of trusts

560:7-202 Trust proceedings; venue

560:7-203 Trust proceedings; dismissal of matters
relating

to foreign trusts

560:7-204 Court; concurrent jurisdiction of
litigation

involving trusts and third parties

560:7-205 Proceedings for review of employment of
agents and

review of compensation of trustee and
employees of

trust

560:7-206 Trust proceedings; initiation by notice;
necessary

parties

Part 3. Duties and Liabilities of
Trustees

560:7-301 General duties not limited

560:7-302 Trustee's standard of care and
performance;

standards for trustee actions under an
advisor's

authority

560:7-303 Duty to inform and account to
beneficiaries

560:7-304 Duty to provide bond

560:7-305 Trustee's duties; appropriate place of

administration; deviation

560:7-306 Personal liability of trustee to third
parties

560:7-307 Limitations on proceedings against
trustees after

final account

Part 4. Powers of Trustees

560:7-401 Powers of trustees

Part 5. Trusts for Animals

560:7-501 Trusts for domestic or pet animals

ARTICLE VIII

EFFECTIVE
DATE AND REPEALER

Part 1. Effect of Act 200, Session Laws
of

Hawaii 1976

560:8-101 Time of taking effect; provisions for
transition

560:8-102 Specific repealer and amendments

Part 2. Effect of Act 288, Session Laws
of

Hawaii 1996

560:8-201 Effect and transition

Part 3. Effect of Act 161, Session Laws
of

Hawaii 2004

560:8-301 Effect

Cross References

Effect and transition of L 1996, c 288 amendments, see
§560:8-201.

Uniform transfer-on-death (TOD) security registration act,
see chapter 539.

Rules of Court

See Hawaii Probate Rules.

Applicability of Hawaii Rules of Civil Procedure, see HRCP
rule 81(a)(1), (c), (f), (g), (h).

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next